Arkansas, session 2025, SB356.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-12-211(b)(3)(A), concerning the release
of information by the Arkansas Crime Information Center to the Office of
Child Support Enforcement or to the Crime Reparations Board, is amended to
read as follows:
(3)(A) It shall be unlawful for any person to disclose
information obtained under this subsection except:
(i) For the purpose of performing the duties of the:
(a) Office of Child Support Enforcement of the
Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration; or
(b) Crime Victims Reparations Board; or
(ii) Upon court order; or
*CEB193*
03/02/2025 6:07:01 PM CEB193

SB356
(iii) To a district court judge, circuit court
judge, Judge of the Court of Appeals, or Justice of the Supreme Court upon
request.

































03/02/2025 6:07:01 PM CEB193